West Virginia, session 2025, HB2810.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-52. Adoption Education Act. (a) Implementation. – An educational institution under the general supervision, governance, or control of the West Virginia State Board of Education, or the board of regents of any public university in this state, shall provide information explaining current adoption practices and where to find resources and support in the state of West Virginia wherever and whenever contraception is discussed or dispensed or both, or sexually transmitted diseases or sexually transmitted infection are discussed or tested for, or both.(b) Family life and sex education; legislative policy. – The Legislature of West Virginia believes that the primary responsibility for family life and sex education, including moral responsibility, rests upon the home and the church and the schools can only complement and supplement those standards which are established in the family. The decision as to whether or not any program in family life and sex education is to be introduced in the schools is a matter for determination at the local district level by the local school board of duly selected representative of the people of the community. If such program is adopted, the legislature believes that such a program should include instruction relating to available adoption resources and current adoption practices in the United States as a means of providing for the well-being of a child and information pertaining to the Safe Haven Act, found in §49-4-201.(c) Enactment. – The superintendent of the West Virginia Department of Education shall ensure the requirements of this section are included in the West Virginia health content standards.(d) Effective date. – This legislation will take effect on July 1, 2025.(e) Conflicts. – All laws in conflict with this legislation are hereby declared null and void.